Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7670.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-19-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-19 entitled "Operation
of Bicycles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-19-14. Turn and stop signals.
(a) Except as provided in this section, a person riding a bicycle shall comply with § 31-16-
5.
(b) A signal of intention to turn right or left when required shall be given continuously
during not less than the last one hundred feet (100′) traveled by the bicycle before turning, and shall
be given while the bicycle is stopped waiting to turn. A signal by hand and arm need not be given
continuously if the hand is needed in control or operation of the bicycle.
(c) A person operating a bicycle approaching a stop sign shall slow down and, if required
for safety, stop before entering the intersection. After slowing to a reasonable speed or stopping,
the person shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another
highway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the person is moving across
or within the intersection or junction of highways. After slowing to a reasonable speed and yielding
the right-of-way, if required, the person operating a bicycle may cautiously make a turn or proceed
through the intersection without stopping.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004926
========
LC004926 - Page 2 of 3